Mississippi, session 2026, SB3399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Gerald Laird of Jefferson Davis County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector on September 25, 2003, in Lauderdale County for the crime of robbery, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years, and thirty-six (36) months of supervised probation within the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released to Earned Released Supervision on November 5, 2005, and discharged from probation on May 7, 2009. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.